Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-616
Judgments and security for debt; authority of State Treasurer to sell and assign.

The State Treasurer is authorized to sell, assign, and transfer any judgment held and owned by the state against any person and to sell, assign, and transfer any security in the nature of a mortgage held on behalf of the permanent school fund to any person who will pay the full amount thereof. The sale and assignment shall transfer to and confer upon such purchaser all the rights of the state in such judgment or security.

Laws 1877, § 1, p. 207;

R.S.1913, § 6679;

C.S.1922, § 6216;

C.S.1929, § 77-2605;

R.S.1943, § 77-2405;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 77-2405;

Laws 1989, LB 13, § 1.